Utah statutes.
31A-5-405.   Meetings of mutuals and mutual policyholders' and members'
voting rights.
(1) (a)  Subject to this section, Sections 16-6a-701, 16-6a-702, 16-6a-704,
and 16-6a-714 apply to the meetings of members, the notice, and the voting in
mutuals.
(b)  Subject to this section and Section 31A-5-409, Section 16-6a-711 applies
to the voting of members of mutuals.
(2) (a)  Policyholders or voting members in all mutuals have the right to vote
on:
(i)  conversion;
(ii)  voluntary dissolution;
(iii)  amendment of the articles; and
(iv)  the election of directors except public directors appointed in
accordance with Subsections 31A-5-409(1) and (2).
(b)  The mutual may adopt reasonable provisions in its bylaws to determine:
(i)  which individual among joint policyholders may exercise a voting right;
and
(ii)  how to deal with cases where the same individual is one of several joint
policyholders in various policies.
(c)  The articles of any mutual may give the policyholders or voting members
additional voting rights.  These articles may require a greater percentage of
affirmative votes to approve an action than the statutes require.
(3) (a)  The articles or bylaws shall contain rules governing voting
procedures and voting eligibility consistent with Subsection (1).
(b)  An amendment to a rule described in this Subsection (3) is not effective
until at least 30 days after the rule has been filed with the commissioner.
(4) (a)  The articles or bylaws may provide for regular or special meetings of
the policyholders or voting members, and, if meetings are not provided for,
then mail elections shall be provided for in lieu of elections at meetings.
(b)  Notice of the time and place of regular meetings or elections shall be
given to each policyholder or voting member in a reasonable manner as the
commissioner approves or requires.  Changes may be made by written notice
mailed, properly addressed, and stamped, to the last-known address of all
policyholders or voting members.
(5) (a)  The articles may provide that representatives or delegates selected
by the policyholders or voting members shall be from specific geographical
districts or defined classes of policyholders or voting members, as determined
on a reasonable basis.
(b) After the representative assembly has been selected by the policyholder or
voting members, the assembly or the respective classes of policyholders or
voting members may choose replacements for members unable to complete their
terms, if the articles provide for their replacement.
(c)  The vote of a person holding a valid proxy is treated as the vote of the
policyholders or voting members who gave the proxy.
